Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0131, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Dependent flexible spending accounts. new text end new text begin For a taxpayer who claims the credit under section 290.067, or for a married taxpayer filing a separate return whose spouse claims the credit under that section, the amount of dependent care assistance that is excluded from gross income under section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code is an addition. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Amount of credit. (a) A taxpayer may take as a credit against the tax due from the taxpayer and a spouse, if any, under this chapter an amount equal to deleted text begin the dependent care credit for which the taxpayer is eligible pursuant to the provisions of section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code except that in determining whether the child qualified as a dependent, income received as a Minnesota family investment program grant or allowance to or on behalf of the child must not be taken into account in determining whether the child received more than half of the child's support from the taxpayerdeleted text end new text begin the taxpayer's eligible dependent care expenses, as determined under subdivisions 1a and 1b, multiplied by the taxpayer's credit percentage, as determined under subdivision 1cnew text end . deleted text begin (b) If a child who has not attained the age of six years at the close of the taxable year is cared for at a licensed family day care home operated by the child's parent, the taxpayer is deemed to have paid employment-related expenses. If the child is 16 months old or younger at the close of the taxable year, the amount of expenses deemed to have been paid equals the maximum limit for one qualifying individual under section 21(c) and (d) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the child is older than 16 months of age but has not attained the age of six years at the close of the taxable year, the amount of expenses deemed to have been paid equals the amount the licensee would charge for the care of a child of the same age for the same number of hours of care. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) If a taxpayer: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) has a child who has not attained the age of one year at the close of the taxable year; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) does not participate in a dependent care assistance program as defined in section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code, in lieu of the actual employment related expenses paid for that child under paragraph (a) or the deemed amount under paragraph (b), the lesser of (i) the earned income of the taxpayer or (ii) the amount of the maximum limit for one qualifying individual under section 21(c) and (d) of the Internal Revenue Code will be deemed to be the employment related expense paid for that child. The earned income limitation of section 21(d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to this deemed amount. These deemed amounts apply regardless of whether any employment-related expenses have been paid. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) If the taxpayer is not required and does not file a federal individual income tax return for the tax year, no credit is allowed for any amount paid to any person unless: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the person are included on the return claiming the credit; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) if the person is an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the name and address of the person are included on the return claiming the credit. deleted text end deleted text begin In the case of a failure to provide the information required under the preceding sentence, the preceding sentence does not apply if it is shown that the taxpayer exercised due diligence in attempting to provide the information required. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end In the case of a nonresident or part-year resident, the credit determined under deleted text begin section 21 of the Internal Revenue Codedeleted text end new text begin this sectionnew text end must be allocated deleted text begin based on the ratio by which the earned income of the claimant and the claimant's spouse from Minnesota sources bears to the total earned income of the claimant and the claimant's spousedeleted text end new text begin using the percentage calculated in section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e)new text end . deleted text begin (f) For residents of Minnesota, the subtractions for military pay under section 290.0132, subdivisions 11 and 12, are not considered "earned income not subject to tax under this chapter." deleted text end deleted text begin (g) For residents of Minnesota, the exclusion of combat pay under section 112 of the Internal Revenue Code is not considered "earned income not subject to tax under this chapter." deleted text end deleted text begin (h) For taxpayers with federal adjusted gross income in excess of $52,230, the credit is equal to the lesser of the credit otherwise calculated under this subdivision, or the amount equal to $600 minus five percent of federal adjusted gross income in excess of $52,230 for taxpayers with one qualifying individual, or $1,200 minus five percent of federal adjusted gross income in excess of $52,230 for taxpayers with two or more qualifying individuals, but in no case is the credit less than zero. deleted text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "employment-related expenses" has the meaning given in section 21(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; new text end new text begin (2) "qualifying individual" has the meaning given in section 21(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that in determining whether the child qualified as a dependent, income received as a Minnesota family investment program grant or allowance to or on behalf of the child must not be taken into account in determining whether the child received more than half of the child's support from the taxpayer; and new text end new text begin (3) "young child" means a qualifying individual who had not attained the age of five by December 31 of the taxable year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Eligible dependent care expenses. new text end new text begin (a) A taxpayer's eligible dependent care expenses equals the amount of employment-related expenses incurred by the taxable year, subject to the limitations in paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) Except as provided in subdivision 1b, a taxpayer's eligible dependent care expenses are limited to: new text end new text begin (1) $3,000 if there was one qualifying individual with respect to the taxpayer; or new text end new text begin (2) $6,000 if there were two or more qualifying individuals with respect to the taxpayer. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Eligible expenses for taxpayers with young children. new text end new text begin For a taxpayer with a young child, the limit in paragraph (b) is increased as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for a taxpayer with one young child with respect to the taxpayer, the limit is increased by $7,000; new text end new text begin (2) for a taxpayer with two young children with respect to the taxpayer, the limit is increased by $14,000; and new text end new text begin (3) for a taxpayer with three or more young children with respect to the taxpayer, the limit is increased by $19,000. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Credit percentage. new text end new text begin (a) The credit percentage equals 50 percent, subject to the reductions in paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) A taxpayer's credit percentage is reduced by one percentage point for each $2,000, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's adjusted gross income exceeds $125,000, until the credit percentage equals 20 percent. new text end new text begin (c) For a taxpayer with adjusted gross income in excess of $400,000, the credit percentage equals 20 percent, reduced by two percentage points for each $2,000, or fraction thereof, by which the taxpayer's adjusted gross income exceeds $400,000. new text end new text begin (d) For a married taxpayer filing a separate return, the credit percentage must be calculated under paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), except the adjusted gross income thresholds are one-half the amounts for other filers, as adjusted for inflation under subdivision 2b. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Inflation adjustment. The commissioner shall annually adjust the dollar amount of the income threshold at which the deleted text begin maximumdeleted text end creditnew text begin percentagenew text end begins to be reduced under subdivision deleted text begin 1deleted text end new text begin 1cnew text end as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year deleted text begin 2019deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Deemed expenses. new text end new text begin (a) If a child who has not attained the age of six years at the close of the taxable year is cared for at a licensed family day care home operated by the child's parent, the taxpayer is deemed to have paid employment-related expenses. The amount of expenses deemed to have been paid equals the amount the licensee would charge for the care of a child of the same age for the same number of hours of care. new text end new text begin (b) A married couple may use a deemed employment expenses amount for a child as calculated under paragraph (c) in lieu of the actual employment-related expenses paid for that child or the deemed employment-related expenses under paragraph (a) if the married couple: new text end new text begin (1) has a child who has not attained the age of one year at the close of the taxable year; and new text end new text begin (2) does not participate in a dependent care assistance program as defined in section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (c) A married couple's deemed employment-related expenses amount under paragraph (b) equals the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) the combined earned income of the couple; or new text end new text begin (2) the amount of the maximum limit for one qualified individual under subdivision 1a, as increased by subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (d) The earned income limitation of section 21(d) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply to deemed employment-related expenses under this subdivision. The deemed employment-related expenses amount applies regardless of whether any employment-related expenses have been paid. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2d. new text end new text begin Identifying information required. new text end new text begin (a) No credit is allowed for any amount paid to any person unless: new text end new text begin (1) the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the person are included on the return claiming the credit; or new text end new text begin (2) if the person is an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the name and address of the person are included on the return claiming the credit. new text end new text begin (b) The rule in section 21(e)(10) of the Internal Revenue Code applies for the credit under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Employment-related expenses. new text end new text begin For the purposes of determining employment-related expenses, the provisions of sections 21(d) and 21(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code apply. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.067, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Rules for married couples filing separate returns. new text end new text begin A married taxpayer filing a separate return may claim the credit under this section, but only one spouse may claim the credit. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end